Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; STUDENT MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities to contract with independent mental health organizations to provide on-campus student mental health services at up to five state colleges under Minnesota Statutes, section 136F.20, subdivision 3. new text end